en: Cameras
xx: Cameras
cs: Fotoaparáty a kamery
da: Kameraer
de: Kameras
es: Cámaras
fr: Appareils photo et caméras
it: Foto/videocamere
ja: カメラ
nl: Camera's
no: Kameraer
pl: Aparaty i kamery
pt: Câmeras
ru: Камеры
sv: Kameror
tr: Fotoğraf Makineleri

en: Borescopes
xx: Borescopes
cs: Boroskopy
da: Endoskoper
de: Boroskope
es: Boroscopios
fr: Boroscopes
it: Boroscopi
ja: ボアスコープ
nl: Borescopen
no: Boroskoper
pl: Boreskopy
pt: Boroscópio
ru: Бороскопы
sv: Fiberskop
tr: Boroskoplar

en: Digital Cameras
xx: Digital Cameras
cs: Digitální fotoaparáty
da: Digitalkameraer
de: Digitalkameras
es: Cámaras digitales
fr: Appareils photo numériques
it: Fotocamere digitali
ja: デジタルカメラ
nl: Digitale camera's
no: Digitale kameraer
pl: Aparaty cyfrowe
pt: Câmeras digitais
ru: Цифровые камеры
sv: Digitalkameror
tr: Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri

en: Disposable Cameras
xx: Disposable Cameras
cs: Fotoaparáty na jedno použití
da: Engangskameraer
de: Einwegkameras
es: Cámaras de fotos desechables
fr: Appareils photo jetables
it: Fotocamere monouso
ja: 使い捨てカメラ
nl: Wegwerpcamera's
no: Engangskameraer
pl: Aparaty jednorazowe
pt: Câmeras descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые камеры
sv: Engångskameror
tr: Kullan At Fotoğraf Makineleri

en: Film Cameras
xx: Film Cameras
cs: Klasické fotoaparáty
da: Filmkameraer
de: Analogkameras
es: Cámaras de cine
fr: Appareils photo argentiques
it: Macchine fotografiche a rullino
ja: フィルムカメラ
nl: Filmcamera's
no: Filmkameraer
pl: Aparaty i kamery analogowe
pt: Câmeras de filme
ru: Пленочные камеры
sv: Filmkameror
tr: Film Kameraları

en: Surveillance Cameras
xx: Surveillance Cameras
cs: Bezpečnostní kamery
da: Overvågningskameraer
de: Überwachungskameras
es: Cámaras de vigilancia
fr: Caméras de surveillance
it: Telecamere di sorveglianza
ja: 監視カメラ
nl: Bewakingscamera's
no: Overvåkningskameraer
pl: Kamery przemysłowe
pt: Câmeras de vigilância
ru: Камеры систем наблюдения
sv: Övervakningskameror
tr: Güvenlik Kameraları

en: Trail Cameras
xx: Trail Cameras
cs: Kamery na sledování zvěře
da: Sporingskameraer
de: Wildkameras
es: Cámaras trampa
fr: Appareils photo de chasse
it: Fototrappole
ja: トレイルカメラ
nl: Volgcamera's
no: Fjernkameraer
pl: Kamery myśliwskie
pt: Câmeras de trilha
ru: Лесные камеры
sv: Jaktkameror
tr: Takip Kameraları

en: Video Cameras
xx: Video Cameras
cs: Videokamery
da: Videokameraer
de: Videokameras
es: Cámaras de vídeo
fr: Caméras vidéo, Caméscopes, Caméscope
it: Telecamere
ja: ビデオカメラ
nl: Videocamera's
no: Videokameraer
pl: Kamery wideo
pt: Câmeras de vídeo
ru: Видеокамеры
sv: Videokameror
tr: Video Kameralar

en: Webcams
xx: Webcams
cs: Webové kamery
da: Webcams
de: Webcams
es: Cámaras web
fr: Webcams
it: Webcam
ja: ウェブカメラ
nl: Webcams
no: Webkameraer
pl: Kamery internetowe
pt: Webcams
ru: Веб-камеры
sv: Webbkameror
tr: Web Kameraları

en: Optics
xx: Optics
cs: Optika
da: Optik
de: Optische Geräte
es: Productos ópticos
fr: Optique
it: Dispositivi ottici
ja: 光学機器
nl: Optiek
no: Optikk
pl: Przyrządy optyczne
pt: Óptica
ru: Оптика
sv: Optik
tr: Optik Ürünleri

en: Binoculars
xx: Binoculars
cs: Binokuláry
da: Binokulære kikkerter
de: Ferngläser
es: Prismáticos
fr: Jumelles
it: Binocoli
ja: 双眼鏡
nl: Verrekijkers
no: Kikkerter
pl: Lornetki
pt: Binóculos
ru: Бинокли
sv: Kikare
tr: Dürbünler

en: Monoculars
xx: Monoculars
cs: Monokuláry
da: Monokulære kikkerter
de: Monokulare
es: Monoculares
fr: Monoculaires
it: Monocoli
ja: 単眼鏡
nl: Monoculairs
no: Enlinsede kikkerter
pl: Lunety
pt: Monóculos
ru: Монокуляры
sv: Monokikare
tr: Tek Gözlü Dürbünler

en: Rangefinders
xx: Rangefinders
cs: Dálkoměry
da: Afstandsmålere til kameraer
de: Optische Entfernungsmesser
es: Sistemas telemétricos
fr: Télémètres
it: Telemetri
ja: レンジファインダー
nl: Meetzoekers
no: Avstandsfinnere
pl: Dalmierze
pt: Telêmetros
ru: Дальномеры
sv: Avståndsmätare
tr: Menzil Bulucular

en: Scopes
xx: Scopes
cs: Puškohledy
da: Teleskoper og kikkerter
de: Fernrohre
es: Visores
fr: Lunettes
it: Cannocchiali
ja: 望遠鏡・スコープ
nl: Telescoopvizieren
no: Sikter og teleskoper
pl: Lunety teleskopowe
pt: Instrumentos óticos
ru: Наблюдательные приборы
sv: Kikare\, teleskop och mikroskop
tr: Uzun Menzilli Dürbünler

en: Spotting Scopes
xx: Spotting Scopes
cs: Spektivy
da: Udsigtskikkerter
de: Spektive
es: Telescopios de observación
fr: Longues-vues
it: Telescopi di avvistamento
ja: フィールドスコープ
nl: Spotting scopes
no: Feltteleskoper
pl: Lunety obserwacyjne
pt: Telescópios compactos
ru: Зрительные трубы
sv: Tubkikare
tr: Yer Gözlem Teleskopları

en: Telescopes
xx: Telescopes
cs: Teleskopické dalekohledy
da: Teleskoper
de: Teleskope
es: Telescopios
fr: Télescopes
it: Telescopi
ja: 望遠鏡
nl: Telescopen
no: Teleskoper
pl: Teleskopy
pt: Telescópios
ru: Телескопы
sv: Teleskop
tr: Teleskoplar

en: Weapon Scopes & Sights
xx: Weapon Scopes & Sights
cs: Puškohledy a hledí
da: Sigtekorn til våben
de: Waffenspektive & Zielfernrohre
es: Miras y visores para armas
fr: Lunettes de visée et viseurs
it: Cannocchiali da tiro e congegni di mira
ja: 照準器
nl: Wapenvizieren en telescoopvizieren
no: Kikkertsikter for våpen
pl: Celowniki optyczne
pt: Lunetas e miras de armas
ru: Оружейные прицелы и оптические приборы
sv: Kikarsikten och sikten
tr: Silah Nişangahları ve Dürbünleri

en: Photography
xx: Photography
cs: Fotografování
da: Fotografi
de: Fotografie
es: Fotografía
fr: Photographie
it: Fotografia
ja: 写真関連用具
nl: Fotografie
no: Fotografering
pl: Fotografia
pt: Fotografia
ru: Фотография
sv: Fotografi
tr: Fotoğrafçılık

en: Darkroom
xx: Darkroom
cs: Temná komora
da: Mørkekammer
de: Dunkelkammer
es: Cuarto oscuro
fr: Chambre noire
it: Camera oscura
ja: 暗室
nl: Donkere kamer
no: Mørkerom
pl: Ciemnia
pt: Quarto escuro
ru: Фотолаборатория
sv: Mörkrum
tr: Karanlık Oda

en: Developing & Processing Equipment
xx: Developing & Processing Equipment
cs: Vybavení pro vyvolávání a úpravu fotografií
da: Fremkaldeudstyr
de: Ausrüstung\, Entwicklung & Verarbeitung
es: Equipo de revelado y procesamiento
fr: Matériel de traitement et de développement
it: Strumenti per sviluppo e trattamento
ja: 現像処理機材
nl: Apparatuur voor ontwikkelen en afdrukken
no: Fremkallings- og behandlingsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do wywoływania i obróbki zdjęć
pt: Equipamento de revelação e processamento
ru: Оборудование для проявки и обработки
sv: Framkallnings- och behandlingsutrustning
tr: Banyo ve İşleme Ekipmanları